Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-104.5 Loss cost filings. When
required by the commissioner, the rating organization or advisory organization
shall file for approval all prospective loss costs, and all supplementary
rating information and every change or amendment or modification of any of the
foregoing proposed for use in this State. The filings shall be subject to
section 431:14-104 and section 431:14-106 and other provisions of article 14
relating to filings made by insurers. [L 1990, c 255, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next